Indiana, session 2026, HB1051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 24-5-23.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 23.8. Health Care Debt Reporting
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "affiliate" means any person who
directly or indirectly:
(1) controls;
(2) is controlled by; or
(3) is under the common control of;
another person.
Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
individual whose principal residence is in Indiana.
(b) The term includes the following:
(1) A protected consumer (as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
(2) A representative acting on behalf of a protected consumer
(as defined in IC 24-5-24.5-4).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consumer report" means any
2026 IN 1051—LS 6073/DI 154


written, oral, or other communication of any information that:
(1) is made by a consumer reporting agency;
(2) bears on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing,
credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics, or mode of living; and
(3) is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in
part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing a
consumer's eligibility for:
(A) credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes;
(B) employment purposes; or
(C) any other purpose authorized under Section 604 of the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681b).
Sec. 4. (a) As used in this chapter, "consumer reporting agency"
means any person that, for monetary fees or dues, or on a
cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part
in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit
information or other information on consumers for the purpose of
furnishing a consumer report to third parties.
(b) The term does not include an entity designated as a
commercially reasonable private consumer credit reporting entity
under IC 24-4.5-7-404(5).
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "delinquent account action",
with respect to a consumer's delinquent account with a health care
provider, means any action taken to initiate, or in furtherance of:
(1) placing the customer's account for collection;
(2) charging the customer's account to profit or loss; or
(3) subjecting the customer's account to any similar action;
whether taken through the health care provider's own actions or
those of a third party furnisher.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "file", when used in connection
with information on a consumer, means all the information on that
consumer that is recorded and retained by a consumer reporting
agency, regardless of how the information is stored.
Sec. 7. (a) As used in this chapter, "health care debt" means an
obligation or an alleged obligation of a consumer to pay an amount
related to the receipt of health care services, products, or devices
provided to a person by a health care provider.
(b) The term does not include debt charged to a credit card
unless the credit card is issued under:
(1) an open-end plan; or
(2) a closed-end plan;
2026 IN 1051—LS 6073/DI 154


offered specifically for the payment of health care services,
products, or devices provided to a person.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "health care provider" means:
(1) a hospital or facility listed in IC 16-39-7-1(a)(13); or
(2) a provider of ambulance services (as defined in
IC 16-18-2-13.4).
The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2).
Sec. 9. (a) As used in this chapter, "third party furnisher"
means a person that regularly and in the ordinary course of
business furnishes to one (1) or more consumer reporting agencies
information about the transactions and experiences of one (1) or
more health care providers with one (1) or more consumers,
including information regarding delinquent account actions,
regardless of whether the delinquent account actions were taken
by:
(1) the person;
(2) the health care provider on whose behalf the person
furnishes the information; or
(3) any other person.
(b) The term includes a collection agency (as defined in
IC 25-11-1-1) that regularly and in the ordinary course of business
engages in the activities described in subsection (a).
(c) The term includes an affiliate, officer, agent, or employee of
a person described in subsection (a) or (b).
Sec. 10. After June 30, 2026, a health care provider:
(1) shall not report or furnish to a consumer reporting agency
any information related to health care debt owed or alleged to
be owed by a consumer; and
(2) shall include in any contract or agreement entered into
with a third party furnisher a provision that prohibits the
reporting or furnishing to a consumer reporting agency any
information related to health care debt owed or alleged to be
owed by a consumer, including information concerning any
delinquent account action taken with respect to health care
debt owed or alleged to be owed by a consumer.
Sec. 11. (a) Subject to subsection (b), a consumer reporting
agency shall not record or retain in the file of a consumer any
information that is:
(1) related to health care debt incurred or alleged to be
incurred by the consumer; and
(2) reported or furnished to the consumer reporting agency
2026 IN 1051—LS 6073/DI 154


after June 30, 2026.
(b) If a consumer reporting agency receives a request from a
consumer to delete any record of health care debt maintained in
the file of the consumer, the consumer reporting agency shall, not
later than five (5) business days after receiving the request, take all
lawful and reasonable actions to delete, or cause to be deleted,
from the consumer's file the record of the health care debt,
regardless of when the health care debt was reported or furnished
to the consumer reporting agency. A consumer reporting agency
may:
(1) prescribe the form and manner in which a consumer must
submit to the consumer reporting agency a request under this
subsection; and
(2) require the consumer to furnish proper identification in
connection with submitting the request.
A consumer reporting agency may not impose any fee or other
charge on any consumer in connection with fulfilling a request
submitted under this subsection.
Sec. 12. A person who violates section 10 or 11 of this chapter
commits a deceptive act that is actionable under IC 24-5-0.5 only
by the attorney general under IC 24-5-0.5-4(c).
2026 IN 1051—LS 6073/DI 154